Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB900.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Mental Health and Intellectual Disability Staff Member Loan Forgiveness Program and Alcohol and Drug Addiction Counselor Loan Forgiveness Program Act.Section 2. Findings and declaration of purpose.The General Assembly finds and declares that:(1) Community-based mental health, intellectual disability and alcohol and drug addiction treatment services offer lifelong supports and opportunities for a meaningful quality of life, in fulfillment of Federal and State laws.(2) Treatment of alcohol and other drug addiction is a 12345678910111213141516171819 crucial investment in health care, in the stability of families and in protecting the public safety.(3) A qualified and stable workforce is the key to quality community mental health and intellectual disability services and to quality alcohol and drug addiction counseling services.(4) The pool of qualified staff members has diminished.(5) The number of college students planning to enter the mental health and intellectual disability profession or the alcohol and drug addiction counseling profession appears to be inadequate to meet the need for staff members in this Commonwealth.(6) Demand from industry and other opportunities attract potential staff members away from these professions.(7) Payment of a portion of student loans for mental health and intellectual disability staff members or alcohol and drug addiction counselors serves the important public purpose of encouraging new staff members to pursue careers in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." The Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency."Counselor." A counselor assistant, counselor or clinical supervisor who qualifies for the Alcohol and Drug Addiction Counselor Loan Forgiveness Program."Licensed alcohol and drug addiction treatment facility." An alcohol or drug addiction treatment facility licensed by the 20250SB0900PN1042 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs to provide addiction treatment services."Qualified counselor applicant." A person applying for the Alcohol and Drug Addiction Counselor Loan Forgiveness Program who meets the following criteria:(1) Is a resident of this Commonwealth.(2) Has successfully completed a two-year or four-year academic degree or diploma or graduate level academic degree or diploma at an accredited college or university.(3) Has been hired as a full-time counselor by a licensed alcohol and drug addiction treatment facility.(4) Has successfully completed the first six months of full-time employment as a counselor at a licensed alcohol and drug addiction treatment facility and remains in good standing with the facility.(5) Has borrowed through and has a current outstanding balance with guaranteed Stafford or consolidation loan programs administered by the agency."Qualified staff member applicant." A person applying for the Mental Health and Intellectual Disability Staff Member Loan Forgiveness Program who meets all of the following criteria:(1) Is a resident of this Commonwealth.(2) Has successfully completed a two-year or four-year academic degree or diploma or graduate-level academic degree or diploma at an accredited college or university.(3) Has been hired as a full-time staff member by a county mental health or intellectual disability service agency within this Commonwealth through a merit or civil service system approved by the Secretary of Human Services or by a private provider that is under contract with either a 20250SB0900PN1042 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 county within this Commonwealth to provide mental health or intellectual disability services or the Department of Human Services to provide behavioral health rehabilitation services to individuals with developmental disabilities.(4) Has successfully completed the first six months of full-time employment as a staff member at a county mental health or intellectual disability service agency within this Commonwealth or a private provider under contract with either a county within this Commonwealth or the Department of Human Services and remains in good standing with the service agency within this Commonwealth or private provider.(5) Performs staff duties at a county mental health or intellectual disability service agency within this Commonwealth or at a private provider within this Commonwealth that is under contract with either a county to provide mental health or intellectual disability services or the Department of Human Services to provide behavioral health rehabilitation services to individuals with developmental disabilities.(6) Has borrowed through and has a current outstanding balance with the guaranteed Stafford or consolidation loan programs administered by the agency.(7) Agrees to work in the field for not less than four years."Recipient." An individual who enters into a contract under section 5 or 6."Staff member." A caseworker, direct support professional, therapist, program coordinator or director who qualifies for the Mental Health and Intellectual Disability Staff Member Loan Forgiveness Program.20250SB0900PN1042 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Establishment.The Mental Health and Intellectual Disability Staff Member Loan Forgiveness Program and the Alcohol and Drug Addiction Counselor Loan Forgiveness Program are established within the agency to aid in the payment of a portion of student loans for mental health and intellectual disability staff members or alcohol and drug addiction counselors employed within this Commonwealth.Section 5. Mental Health and Intellectual Disability Staff Member Loan Forgiveness Program.(a) Components.--Components shall be as follows:(1) A qualified staff member applicant who is selected for the Mental Health and Intellectual Disability Staff Member Loan Forgiveness Program in accordance with this act shall be eligible for payment by the agency of a portion of the debt incurred by the qualified staff member applicant through the guaranteed Stafford or consolidation loan programs administered by the agency for the education necessary to be a mental health or intellectual disability professional in this Commonwealth if the qualified staff member applicant enters into a contract with the agency that requires the recipient to remain employed as a full-time mental health or intellectual disability professional in this Commonwealth for a period of two consecutive years.(2) The agency may forgive a proportional part of the qualified staff member applicant's loan so that the loan may be entirely forgiven over four years of full-time staff work. No more than $6,250 shall be forgiven in any year, and not more than $25,000 shall be forgiven for any qualified staff member applicant.20250SB0900PN1042 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Payments shall be made in accordance with the procedures established by the agency.(4) The contract entered into with the agency under paragraph (1) shall be considered a contract with the Commonwealth and shall include the following terms:(i) The recipient shall agree to be employed by a county mental health or intellectual disability service agency located within this Commonwealth or by a private provider of mental health or intellectual disability services for a period of not less than four years in the field.(ii) The recipient shall permit the agency to determine compliance with the work requirement and the other terms of the contract.(iii) Upon the recipient's death or total or permanent disability, the agency shall nullify the service obligation of the recipient.(iv) If the recipient is convicted of or pleads guilty or no contest to a felony, the agency shall have the authority to terminate the recipient's service in the program and demand repayment of the amount of the loan as of the date of the conviction.(v) Recipients who fail to begin or complete the obligations contracted for shall pay to the agency the amount of the loan received under the terms of the contract under this section. Providing false information or misrepresentation on an application or verification of service shall be deemed a default. Determination as to the time of the default shall be made by the agency.(b) Limitations.--A loan forgiveness award under this act 20250SB0900PN1042 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall not be made for a loan that is in default at the time of the application. Loan forgiveness provided under the provisions of this act shall not be concurrently awarded to an individual in receipt of another Commonwealth-provided loan forgiveness program.Section 6. Alcohol and Drug Addiction Counselor Loan Forgiveness Program.(a) Components.--Components shall be as follows:(1) A qualified counselor applicant who is selected for the Alcohol and Drug Addiction Counselor Loan Forgiveness Program in accordance with this act shall be eligible for payment by the agency of a portion of the debt incurred by the qualified counselor applicant through the guaranteed Stafford or consolidation loan programs administered by the agency for the education necessary to be an alcohol and drug addiction counseling professional in this Commonwealth if the qualified counselor applicant enters into a contract with the agency that requires the recipient to remain employed as a full-time alcohol and drug addiction counseling professional in this Commonwealth for a period of two consecutive years.(2) The agency may forgive a proportional part of the qualified counselor applicant's loan so that the loan may be entirely forgiven over four years of full-time staff work. No more than $6,250 shall be forgiven in any year, and not more than $25,000 shall be forgiven for any qualified counselor applicant.(3) Payments shall be made in accordance with the procedures established by the agency.(4) The contract entered into with the agency under paragraph (1) shall be considered a contract with the 20250SB0900PN1042 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth and shall include the following terms:(i) The recipient shall agree to be employed by a licensed alcohol and drug addiction treatment facility located within this Commonwealth for a period of not less than four years in the field.(ii) The recipient shall permit the agency to determine compliance with the work requirement and all other terms of the contract.(iii) Upon the recipient's death or total or permanent disability, the agency shall nullify the service obligation of the recipient.(iv) If the recipient is convicted of or pleads guilty or no contest to a felony, the agency shall have the authority to terminate the recipient's service in the program and demand repayment of the amount of the loan as of the date of the conviction.(v) Recipients who fail to begin or complete the obligations contracted for shall pay to the agency the amount of the loan received under the terms of the contract under this section. Providing false information or misrepresentation on an application or verification of service shall be deemed a default. Determination as to the time of the default shall be made by the agency.(b) Limitation.--A loan forgiveness award under this act shall not be made for a loan that is in default at the time of the application. Loan forgiveness provided under the provisions of this act shall not be concurrently awarded to an individual in receipt of another Commonwealth-provided loan forgiveness program.Section 7. Tax applicability.20250SB0900PN1042 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Loan forgiveness repayments by a student shall not be considered taxable income for purposes of Article II of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 8. Annual report.(a) Development of report.--The agency shall post a report on the agency's publicly accessible Internet website by October 1, 2025, and each October 1 thereafter for the immediately preceding fiscal year. The report shall include information regarding the operation of the Mental Health and Intellectual Disability Staff Member Loan Forgiveness Program and the Alcohol and Drug Addiction Counselor Loan Forgiveness Program, including:(1) The number and amount of mental health and intellectual disability staff member and alcohol and drug addiction counselor contracts executed and renewed for mental health and intellectual disability staff member loan forgiveness applicants and alcohol and drug addiction counselor loan forgiveness applicants.(2) The number of defaulted mental health and intellectual disability staff member and alcohol and drug addiction counselor contracts, reported by cause.(3) The number of full-time staff members of mental health and intellectual disability service agencies, the number of full-time staff employees of private providers and the number of full-time staff employees of licensed alcohol and drug addiction facilities participating in the programs under this subsection, reported by type of institution attended, including four-year educational institutions, community colleges and independent two-year colleges.20250SB0900PN1042 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The number and type of enforcement actions taken by the agency.(b) Submission.--The annual report under subsection (a) shall be submitted to the Governor, the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chair and minority chair of the Education Committee of the Senate, the chair and minority chair of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives, the chair and minority chair of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 9. Appeals.The provisions of this act shall be subject to 22 Pa. Code Ch. 121 (relating to student financial aid).Section 10. Loan forgiveness awards.(a) Qualified recipients.--Recipients of loan forgiveness awards under this act shall be those qualified staff member applicants or qualified counselor applicants who are working in and who have received a satisfactory rating from:(1) a county office of mental health or intellectual disability service within this Commonwealth;(2) a private provider within this Commonwealth under contract with a county within this Commonwealth or the Department of Human Services; or(3) a licensed alcohol and drug addiction treatment facility.(b) Documentation required.--Staff members or counselors shall submit documentation of eligibility as the agency may require, including documentation to indicate full-time 20250SB0900PN1042 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employment, as full-time employment is defined by a county office, a private provider or a licensed alcohol or drug addiction treatment facility. The documentation shall be presented to the agency in the form of a letter from the employer of the qualified counselor or qualified staff member applicants stating that the applicant is employed by the mental health or intellectual disability service provider or a licensed alcohol and drug addiction treatment facility and that the applicant performs the applicant's duties in a satisfactory manner.Section 11. Funding.Loan forgiveness awards under this act may be made to the extent that funds are appropriated by the General Assembly and are sufficient to cover the administration of the programs under this act. In the event that funding is insufficient to fully fund the administration of this act, recipients and all eligible applicants, priority shall be given to recipients who renew eligibility under this act. After fully funding recipients who renew, the agency shall utilize a random lottery system for determining which applicants receive loan forgiveness awards.Section 12. Responsibility of agency.The agency shall administer the programs established by this act and shall adopt regulations, policies, procedures and forms as are necessary and consistent with the provisions of this act.Section 13. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0900PN1042 - 11 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526